California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) (1) No person shall locate or maintain an apiary on any public land without the expressed oral or written approval of the entity that owns, leases, controls, or occupies the land, and can establish this approval upon demand of the secretary or the commissioner. The approval shall include the name
 and telephone number of the person granting the approval. During the citrus bloom period, as established by the commissioner, including 72 hours before the declaration of the bloom period until 48 hours after the conclusion of the bloom period, the apiary operator shall obtain written permission to place bees on public land, and shall make it available to the secretary or the commissioner upon demand. Any apiary located or maintained on public land without lawful consent is a public nuisance and may be subject to seizure by the secretary or the commissioner.

(2) The secretary or commissioner may commence proceedings in the superior court of the county or city and county in which the seizure is made petitioning the court for judgment forfeiting the apiary. Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall fix a time for a
 hearing and cause notices to be posted for 14 days in at least three public places in the place where the court is held, if the person owning the apiary is unknown, setting forth the substance of the petition and the time and place fixed for its hearing. At that time, the court shall hear and determine the proceeding and upon proof that the apiary was located or maintained on public lands without approval of the entity, may order the apiary forfeited. Any apiary so forfeited shall be sold or destroyed by the secretary or the commissioner. The proceeds from all sales shall be used in accordance with Section 29032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 320, Sec. 3.   (AB 2468)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

29047.

Any person who owns or is in possession of an apiary may bring an action to recover damages for any injury to the apiary by reason of any pest control operation if the person has complied with Sections 29043, 29046, 29070, and 29070.5, and with regulations adopted by the secretary providing for the protection of bees under Sections 11502, 14005, and 29080 when these requirements apply to the property where the alleged damage has occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 300, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

29048.

Any pesticide applicator who experiences any loss because of a beekeeper’s failure to request notification of a pesticide application pursuant to Section 29101, or pursuant to any department rule or regulation, or who experiences any loss because of a beekeeper’s failure to register bees pursuant to Section 29041 or 29042, may bring an action for the recovery of damages against that beekeeper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

29049.

The owner of any apiary equipment may apply to the director for a serial number brand for use on apiary equipment which he or she owns. The application shall contain the name and address of the applicant and shall be accompanied by a fee, as established and periodically updated, by the director by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29050.

Upon receipt of the application and fee, the director shall register a serial number brand to the applicant. The serial number shall include a county number followed by an individual number. The county number shall be and remain the same as the number of the class of the county in the classification which was adopted by the Legislature in 1931. As to counties with classification numbers 1 to 9, inclusive, the county number shall be preceded by a dash (—). The county number shall be followed by a dash (—) and the individual number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29051.

If a serial number brand is used on wooden equipment, it shall be burned into the wood in numbers which are at least one-half inch in height. Hive bodies shall be branded on the upper left-hand corner. Frames shall be branded or stenciled on top bars. Other wooden equipment may be branded in any manner desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29052.

Serial number brands are transferrable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29053.

(a) If the purchaser does not have a registered brand number, he or she may use a brand acquired by purchase if a bill of sale on the purchased brand number is forwarded by registered mail to the director accompanied by a transfer fee as established and periodically updated by the director by regulation.

(b) If the purchaser has a previously registered brand number, he or she may have other brand numbers transferred to his or her name, without charge, but he or she shall destroy any and all branding irons or branding devices acquired by the transfer and notify the director of the destruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29054.

If ownership of branded equipment is transferred, the original brand shall not be defaced or obliterated. The brand, if any, of the new owner shall be placed below the original brand and as near it as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29055.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession any apiary equipment which is branded with any serial number brand other than his or her own unless he or she has a bill of sale which he or she obtained from the registered owner of the serial brand number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29056.

It is unlawful for any person to do any one of the following:

(a) Use any serial number brand unless it is registered pursuant to this article provided that the National Crime Identification Center (NCIC) numbers may be used.

(b) Alter, deface, remove, or obliterate the brand on any apiary equipment to prevent the identification of the equipment.

(c) Be in possession of any apiary equipment upon which the brand has been altered, defaced, removed, or obliterated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29057.

Any funds collected by the secretary pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for administration, research, control of pests, and enforcement of this chapter, as advised by the board and approved by the secretary, less the funds used to reimburse counties pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29044.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 23.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Intrastate Movement [29070. - 29074.]

29070.

(a) Any person relocating a colony of bees from a registered apiary in one county to another county, where the apiary is not registered for the current calendar year, shall notify the destination commissioner within 72 hours of the first movement or entry into the county. The notification shall include all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the apiary operator or the operator’s designated representative.

(2) A telephone number where the apiary operator or the operator’s designated representative may be reached.

(b) The apiary operator or the
 operator’s designated representative shall provide locations of each colony upon request by the commissioner of any county.

(c) Subsequent movement into the destination county shall require further notification to the commissioner within 72 hours of movement.

(d) When the apiary operator removes the last colony from the county, the operator shall notify
 the commissioner of that final movement within 72 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

29070.5.

Any apiary operator or the apiary operator’s designated representative relocating a colony of bees within a county where the apiary is currently registered shall notify the commissioner of the movement within 72 hours of the relocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 300, Sec. 5.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

29071.

It is lawful for any person when under the supervision of the local county agricultural commissioner, except when prohibited by other provisions of this chapter, to do any of the following:

(a) Transport any contaminated hive, together with its contents, to a suitable place for burning or disposal, pursuant to Section 29208 or to a wax salvage plant licensed under Article 11 (commencing with Section 29150), after the person has killed the bees in the hive and sealed the hive to prevent the entrance of live bees.

(b) Transport contaminated comb, including any frame associated with it, to a suitable place for burning or disposal, pursuant to Section 29208 or to a wax salvage plant,
 licensed under the provisions of Article 11 (commencing with Section 29150) if the comb is tightly enclosed to prevent access to the comb by bees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 8.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29072.

No person shall move or transport any bees, comb, appliances, or colonies within the state that contain pests, except for abatement pursuant to this chapter or for research pursuant to Section 29074.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 9.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29073.

The inspector, in a summary manner, may destroy, where required, any and all colonies, bees, combs, or hives that contain pests that are unlawfully moved within the state wherever they may be found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 10.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29074.

The secretary, by written permit, subject to conditions the secretary may determine are necessary to protect the beekeeping industry of this state, may authorize federal and state agencies to transport and maintain within the state diseased bees, comb, hives, appliances, or colonies for the purpose of studying methods of eradicating and controlling bee diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 320, Sec. 6.   (AB 2468)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notification Regions [29080. - 29082.]

29080.

As used in this article and in Article 7 (commencing with Section 29100) “director” means the Director of Pesticide Regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

29080.5.

The director may, after notice and hearing, establish regions for the notification of apiary owners relative to pesticide applications if the director determines that the notification could be effectively accomplished on a regional basis and that there would be sufficient interest among beekeepers and pest control operators to make substantial participation in a regional notification system likely. The regions may be composed of more than one county or portions of counties, but no single county or portion of a county may become an entire region.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 29080 by Stats. 1993, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

29081.

Upon the establishment of a notification region, the director shall designate one of the commissioners within the region as the coordinator for the region. The coordinator may receive, upon request, any necessary technical assistance from the University of California, other commissioners, and the department in the development of a regional notification system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29082.

The coordinator may receive money from any source and shall deposit the funds in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund, or with the approval of the director, in the county treasury, for expenditure pursuant to the purposes of this article, upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature, or, if the funds are deposited in the county treasury, by the county board of supervisors. The director may, if he or she determines that it is necessary, establish fees for beekeepers and pest control operators who participate. The fees may, if necessary, vary for different regions, but shall in no case be greater than the amount necessary to defray the expenses of that region. If an unexpended surplus exists for more than two consecutive years, the surplus funds shall be transferred to the beekeeping program. If the operation of the system is suspended or terminated, any unexpended moneys shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used as prescribed in Section 29032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 166, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Use of Pesticides [29100. - 29103.]

29100.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that bees perform a valuable service to agriculture in this state.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the necessary application of certain pesticides to blossoming plants poses a potential hazard to bees.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the use of pesticides is necessary for the protection of agricultural crops.

(d) The Legislature further finds and declares that certain factors, including, but not limited to, the time of application, the type of pesticides used, the type of blossoming plant involved, the proximity of the apiaries, and the ability to locate and notify the owners of the apiaries involved, directly affect the extent of the harm to bees resulting from pesticides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29101.

(a) Each beekeeper shall report to the commissioner of the county in which the beekeeper’s apiary is located, on a form approved by the secretary, each location of apiaries for which notification of pesticide usage is sought. This report for notification may be filed with and be part of the form used for registration pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 29040), or shall be submitted in writing if notice of relocation is made as set forth in Section 29070 or 29070.5. Except for reports filed as part of an initial registration pursuant to Section 29040, each request shall be provided electronically or shall be mailed within 72 hours before locating an apiary, where feasible, but in no event later than 72 hours after locating an apiary.

(b) The beekeeper
 shall not be entitled to notification until receipt and processing of the report is made by the commissioner. However, the commissioner may provide notice earlier if practicable.

(c) Notice to pesticide applicators shall not be required until the written report by the beekeeper has been received and processed by the commissioner, except that the commissioner may provide notice earlier if practicable.

(d) The commissioner shall process the written report as expeditiously as reasonable, but shall not exceed 16 working hours. The 16-hour period shall commence upon receipt of the written report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 11.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29102.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations necessary to minimize the hazard to bees, while still providing for the reasonable and necessary application of pesticides toxic to bees to blossoming plants. The regulations may be limited to specific blossoming plants.

(b) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section may be applicable to either the entire state or specified areas of the state. Regulations that are applicable to only specified areas of the state shall include provisions for the mandatory notice of movement of apiaries, including any relocation thereof within the area to which the regulations are applicable.

(c) The regulations may also include provisions for timely notification of apiary owners of proposed pesticide applications, and limitations on the time and method of application of pesticides and the pesticides used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

29103.

Failure of a beekeeper to remove hives from a specific location, except during specific periods of time, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 29102 after notification, shall not prevent the application of pesticides to blossoming plants if consistent with the pesticide’s labeling and regulations. When the pesticide applicator has complied with the notification pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 29102 the applicator shall not be liable for injury to bees that enter the area treated during or after the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Quarantine [29110. - 29114.]

29110.

The secretary may adopt by regulation and establish, maintain, and enforce a quarantine at the boundaries of, or within, the state, to protect the bee industry against the introduction or spread of any bee pest. The secretary may make and enforce such regulations as may be necessary to prevent any bees, comb, hives, or appliances from passing over any quarantine line that is established and proclaimed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 12.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29111.

If any quarantine is established pursuant to this article, no person shall move any bees, comb, hive, or appliance, across the lines established by the quarantine except pursuant to the regulations of the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29112.

If an inspector finds any pest or disease which is known to be contagious in any apiary, the inspector may hold the apiary and may require that abatement be performed under his or her direct supervision. The inspector shall give notice that the apiary is held to the owner or bailee and post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place in the apiary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29113.

If notice that an apiary is being held has been given pursuant to Section 29112, no person shall move the apiary, or any part of the apiary, or any other bee equipment from the location, unless the person is authorized by an inspector, until the hold order is released.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29114.

Upon request of the owner of any apiary which is held pursuant to an order by an inspector, the inspector shall release the hold order by issuing a permit to move the apiary if the inspector determines that the pest or disease has been abated. The permit shall state on it that the apiary had been under a hold order at the point of origin, was released from the hold order, and the date of release.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Importation [29120. - 29128.]

29120.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 29121, no person shall import or transport into the state any comb, bees on comb, queen bees, package bees, bee semen, or any used hive or used appliance, unless each separate load, lot, or shipment is accompanied by a valid certificate prescribed by this article, and filed in a form and in the manner as set forth by the director, and unless the certificate is delivered to the commissioner of the county of destination or to the director, if there is no commissioner in the county, within 72 hours after the arrival of the load, lot, or shipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29121.

(a) A person may import or transport any of the following into the state without complying with the requirements prescribed by Section 29120:

(1) Packaged comb honey.

(2) Empty package bee cages.

(3) Moving screens.

(4) Bee smokers.

(5) Bee veils.

(6) Hive tools.

(b) No importation shall be allowed if it would violate any quarantine regulation adopted by the director pursuant to Section 29110.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29122.

Except as provided in Section 29123, the certificate required by Section 29120 shall be signed by the State Entomologist, State Apiary Inspector, or comparable officer in charge of apiary inspection for the state or territory of origin and shall certify to all of the following facts:

(a) The name and address of the owner or shipper and the place of destination in this state.

(b) The number or amount of queen bees, package bees, bee semen, hives, or nuclei that contain bees, the number of used hives either empty or containing comb, and a complete list of any other used beekeeping equipment in the shipment.

(c) The county
 and state or territory of origin.

(d) The date on which inspection was last made of the apiary in which the bees, comb, used hives, and appliances originated.

(e) That the apiary was found free of all pests denoted as pests by the State of California, using detection procedures and methods approved by the secretary.

(f) If the pest is American foulbrood, the total number of colonies in the apiary at the time of inspection, and the number of colonies found infested.

(g) That all American foulbrood colonies of bees found upon inspection were destroyed, removed to a quarantine apiary, removed to wax salvage, or other specified methods of destruction pursuant to Section 29208, before the issuance of the certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 13.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29123.

In lieu of the requirements of Section 29122, the certificate required by Section 29120 may be a California certificate of inspection issued pursuant to Sections 29140 to 29145, inclusive, and showing the comb, bees on comb, or hives or appliances has or had been inspected in California within the 12 months prior to their return to California and at the time of the inspections had been found to have had less than 1 percent American foulbrood disease. Beekeepers or their agents shall carry a copy of the certificate with them and proof of ownership of the apiary and its contents, for production to the border inspectors on demand upon reentry.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29124.

Any shipment of bees on comb, used hives, or used appliances arriving in this state which is not accompanied by, where required by Section 29120, a valid certificate shall be refused entry and returned to the shipper or destroyed, at the option and expense of the owner or person in charge of the shipment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29125.

The certificates required by Section 29120 are valid only during the inspection season in which they were issued, except that a certificate that covers a shipment arriving prior to April 1 from a locality that has severe winters shall be valid if it shows the last inspection of the apiary was made on or after August 15 of the preceding year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29126.

(a) If any bees, comb, hives, or appliances entering California are found to be diseased at the time of inspection in this state within 30 days after arrival, the inspector may hold the apiary, lot, or shipment. The inspector shall give notice to the owner or bailee, as prescribed in Section 29113, that the apiary, lot, or shipment is held.

(b) If any load, lot, or shipment of bees, comb, hives, or appliances, entering California are found at the time of inspection in this state within 30 days after arrival to have more than 2 percent American foulbrood disease, that load, lot, or shipment of bees, comb, hives, or appliances shall be removed from the state and returned to the shipper.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29127.

Any American foulbrood disease or other disease found pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 29126 shall be abated pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 29200) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29128.

After the American foulbrood disease or other disease has been abated, the inspector may release the hold order, if the release can be made without menace or harm from the disease to the bee industry of this state. If the release cannot be so made, after the disease has been abated, the remaining bees, comb, hives, and appliances shall be destroyed or shipped out of this state within 72 hours after the expiration of the abatement notice, at the option and expense of the owner or bailee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Exportation [29140. - 29145.]

29140.

As used in this article, “certificate” means the certification by a commissioner, or an inspector of the condition of any apiary which is to be transported to another state or country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29141.

The board of supervisors of any county may estalish a schedule of fees for certificates for bees on comb to be paid by persons that request the certificates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.

No fee shall be charged for certification required by any law, regulation, or requirement of the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29143.

The schedule of fees for the certificates shall be based upon the estimated cost of the inspection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29144.

A commissioner shall make reasonable inspection as may be necessary to determine the facts which are required by the state or country of intended destination and shall issue a certificate that states the facts which are determined upon receipt of the scheduled fee for a certificate or, if no scheduled fee has been established, upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29145.

It is unlawful for any person to alter, deface, or misuse any certificate issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Wax Salvage [29150. - 29157.]

29150.

No person shall remove, salvage, or attempt to salvage, any bees, comb, honey, royal jelly, pollen, beeswax, or frames from any diseased colony, including American foulbrood disease, except pursuant to this article or Section 29074.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29151.

All wax salvage operations with respect to diseased colonies shall be performed in an enclosure which is constructed in accordance with specifications, and in the manner set forth, in regulations of the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29152.

The director shall prepare and furnish to interested parties upon request, uniform specifications for the construction of wax salvage plants, and adopt regulations for the operation of the plants in a manner to prevent the spread of pests or disease from the plants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29153.

Any person that desires to maintain and operate a plant for the salvaging of wax, hives, and appliances from diseased apiaries shall apply to the director for an annual license for each separate wax salvage plant.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29154.

The director shall make such investigations as the director determines are necessary and shall issue the license without fee if the director is satisfied that the plant is constructed in accordance with specifications in, and that the plant will be operated pursuant to, regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29155.

A license is good for the calendar year within which it is issued and shall expire on December 31, of that year, unless it is revoked or suspended sooner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29156.

Any license which is issued pursuant to this article may be revoked or suspended, or a license renewal may be refused by the director, after hearing, if the director finds that the licensee has not complied with this article and the regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29157.

To the greatest extent possible, the proceedings for all hearings under this article shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall have all the powers which are granted by the chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Sanitation [29170. - 29181.]

29170.

No person shall maintain or operate a diseased colony of bees, except pursuant to Section 29074.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29171.

No person shall conceal or attempt to conceal the fact that disease exists within an apiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29172.

No person shall sell any diseased bees, comb, hive, appliance, or colony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29173.

No person shall abandon any diseased apiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29174.

No person shall expose to bees any comb or honey from a diseased colony of bees, except pursuant to Section 29074.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29175.

No person shall extract or render any honey, pollen, or wax from comb except in a building or enclosure which is so constructed as to prevent access by bees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29176.

No person shall possess any comb which is not occupied by a live bee colony unless the comb is tightly enclosed to prevent access to the comb by bees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29177.

Any hive or appliance which contains any comb that is not occupied by a live bee colony and that is accessible to bees constitutes a public nuisance. The hive or appliance shall be subject to abatement in the same manner as is provided in Article 14 (commencing with Section 29200) of this chapter for abatement of disease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29178.

No person shall make honey available to bees by means of open air feeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29179.

All beekeepers shall provide movable frames in the brood area of all hives which they use to contain bees, and shall make provisions so the bees in the hives shall construct combs in the frames in such a way that the combs may be removed from the hives for inspection without damaging other combs in the hives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29180.

The inspector shall order the owner, broker, or person in charge of any bees that are kept in a box or other unmovable or stationary comb hive to transfer the bees to a movable frame hive within a reasonable time, to be specified in the order. In default of transfer by the owner, broker, or person in charge of the bees, the inspector may destroy in a summary manner the hive and its contents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 14.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29181.

No person shall place, in any combless package of bees or queen bees offered for sale or shipment, any food which contains honey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Colony Strength [29190. - 29195.]

29190.

The director may establish a system for certifying colony strength for bees used in the pollination of agricultural crops.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29191.

The colony strength of a bee colony shall be certified after inspection on the basis of the number of active frames of bees per colony, as determined by either cluster count or frame count, or both, or another method approved by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 15.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29192.

The inspection and certification of colony strength of bees may be made by department employees, the commissioner or persons authorized by the commissioner, or persons appointed by the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29193.

Inspection and certification shall be made at the request of the beekeeper or agricultural producer involved. The party requesting the inspection and certification shall pay for the service. To the greatest extent possible, the inspector shall endeavor to give the beekeeper advance notice of the scheduled date of the inspection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29194.

The director may by regulation establish reasonable fees to cover the cost of inspection and certification performed by department employees and persons appointed by the director, other than the agricultural commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29195.

The board of supervisors of the county may establish reasonable fees to cover the cost of inspection and certification performed by the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Apiary Inspection [29200. - 29213.]

29200.

The Legislature finds that in order to ensure the vitality of the apiary industry, to protect the welfare of the people of the State of California, as well as agricultural crops dependent upon bees for pollination, a pest inspection program should be an integral part of the regulatory scheme contained in this division. The Legislature further finds that without a continuing regular inspection program, including continued training for inspectors or commissioners in apiculture with curriculum approved by the secretary, as further specified in this article, the programs and requirements of law set forth in this division will be impaired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 16.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29201.

(a) The secretary, or the commissioner, or any inspector acting under their direction, may enter if they determine it to be necessary, any location where an apiary is maintained, and make an inspection of the apiary, including ancillary buildings. The inspector shall give notice of the inspection where the notice would not interfere with the purpose of the inspection. To the greatest extent possible, the beekeeper or their representative may be present for an internal inspection of the hives. The right of inspection shall occur at reasonable times, and shall not include any dwelling. If the inspector desires entry to any dwelling because the inspector suspects maintenance problems regarding a colony, hive, comb, or appliance therein, the inspector, upon request, shall obtain a warrant
 pursuant to the provisions of Section 1822.50 of the Civil Code and comply with the provisions therein. No person shall interfere with the entry of an inspector in the official course of the inspector’s duty. The inspector shall report the result of the inspection to the beekeeper, where feasible, within five days of the inspection. An inspector shall use appropriate sanitation protocols developed in conjunction with beekeeping industry, and included in the annual training.

(b) If the inspector finds American foulbrood disease has infected more than two hives of 99 colonies or less, or 2 percent or more of colonies of 100 or more, the inspector shall make a complete inspection of all the hives in the apiary and the owner of the hives in the apiary shall pay the cost of the complete inspection. If the inspector finds American foulbrood disease has infested less than 2 percent of colonies of 100 or more as the result of an inspection made after
 the disease was brought to the inspector’s attention in writing, the commissioner may assess the costs of the inspection on the person who brought the disease to the inspector’s attention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 17.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29202.

If, in the course of an inspection authorized by Section 29201, the inspector finds or has reason to suspect that there are pests in the apiary, the inspector shall plainly mark the hives or any part thereof which contain evidence of pest infestation. The inspector may place a band with a seal around a diseased hive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29203.
